Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-265
Authority; bondholders; contract; purposes; money; how secured.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 58-264, the authority may contract with the holders of any of its bonds as to the custody, collection, securing, investment, and payment of any money of the authority and of any money held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds and may carry out such contract. Money held in trust or otherwise for the payment of bonds or in any way to secure bonds and deposits of money may be secured in the same manner as money of the authority, and all banks and trust companies may give security for the deposits.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 65;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 63.